Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Article III Management of the Time-Share Property

34-41-3.01.
Managing entity.

If the number of time shares in a time-share property is more than twelve (12), the developer, before the first transfer of a time-share, must create or provide a managing entity to manage the time-share property. The managing entity may be (i) a manager, who may be the developer, or, (ii) an association, which must be a profit or non-profit corporation or an unincorporated association, the membership of which must at all times consist exclusively of all the time-share owners. If the time-share property is part of a project containing time-share units and other units, the manager may be the entity that governs the project. If the number of time shares in the time-share property is twelve (12) or fewer and there is no managing entity, the time-share owners may form an association meeting the requirements specified above.

In the absence of a managing entity required by this section, a court upon application of a party in interest, including a time-share owner or a lienholder, may appoint and prescribe the powers of a managing entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-3.02.
Powers of managing entity.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) and the time-share instrument, the association, even if unincorporated, may:

Adopt and amend bylaws, rules, and regulations;

Adopt and amend budgets for revenues, expenditures, and reserves and collect assessments for time-share expenses from time-share owners;

Hire and discharge managing agents and other agents, employees, and independent contractors;

Institute, defend, or intervene in litigation or administrative proceedings in its own name on behalf of itself or two (2) or more time-share owners on matters affecting the time-share property or time shares;

Make contracts and incur liabilities;

Regulate the use, maintenance, repair, replacement, and modification of the time-share property;

Cause additional improvements to be made to the time-share property;

Impose charges for late payment of assessments and, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, levy reasonable fines for violations of the time-share instrument, bylaws, and rules or regulations of the association;

Impose reasonable charges for the preparation of resale certificates required by §

34-41-4.07

or statements of unpaid assessments;

Exercise any other powers conferred by the time-share instrument or bylaws;

Impose and receive any payment, fees, or charges for the use, rental, or operation of the time-share property, and for services provided to time-share owners;

Acquire, hold, encumber, and convey in its own name any right, title, or interest to real or personal property;

Assign its right to future income, including the right to receive time-share expense assessments, but only to the extent the time-share instrument expressly so provides;

Provide for the indemnification of its directors and officers and maintain directors’ and officers’ liability insurance;

Exercise all other powers that may be exercised in this state by legal entities of the same type as the association;

Exercise any other powers necessary and proper for the governance and operation of the association; and

Convey easements and generally deal with common areas of the property and execute any and all documents related thereto upon authorization by unit owners in accordance with §§

34-41-3.14

,

34-41-3.15

or

34-41-3.16

.

The time-share instrument may not impose limitations on the power of the association to deal with the developer which are more restrictive than the limitations imposed on the power of the association to deal with other persons.

Except as otherwise provided in the time-share instrument, the manager, to the extent permitted by the management contract, may exercise the powers specified in subdivisions (1) — (11) of subsection (a).

If the time-share property is a part of a project, neither this section nor §

34-41-3.03

confers any powers on the managing entity, the developer, or the time-share owners with respect to any portion of the project other than the units within the time-share property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-3.03.
Powers and duties in absence of managing entity.

The developer has the duties imposed on the managing entity by this chapter and the powers listed in §

34-41-3.02(a)(1)

— (11) until a managing entity is provided or the developer and his or her affiliates own no estate or interest in the time-share property. Thereafter, if there is no managing entity and the number of time shares in the time-share property is twelve (12) or fewer, the time-share owners have those powers subject to any provisions of the time-share instrument relating to the manner of the exercise thereof and have the responsibilities and liabilities of an association for the purposes of §§

34-41-3.06

and

34-41-3.07

. To the extent that the time-share instrument is silent with respect to the manner of exercise of any of those powers, the time-share owners may exercise them only by unanimous action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-3.04.
Transfer of special developer rights.

For the purposes of this section, “special developer right” means a right reserved for the benefit of a developer to add more units to a time-share property (§

34-41-2.02(a)(5)

); to maintain sales offices, management offices, models, and signs (§

34-41-2.06

); or to appoint, control, or serve as the managing entity. No special developer right created or reserved under this chapter may be transferred except by an instrument evidencing the transfer recorded in every office of municipal land evidence records in which any portion of the time-share property is located. The instrument is not effective unless it is also executed by the transferee.

Upon transfer of a special developer right, the liability of a transferor developer is as follows:

A transferor is not relieved of any obligation or liability arising before the transfer and remains liable for warranty obligations imposed upon him or her by this chapter. Lack of privity does not deprive any time-share owner of standing to maintain an action to enforce any obligation of the transferor.

If a successor to any special developer right is an affiliate of a developer (§

34-41-1.02(1)

), the transferor is jointly and severally liable with the successor for any obligations or liabilities of the successor relating to the time-share property.

If a transferor retains any special developer right, but transfers other special developer rights to a successor who is not an affiliate of the developer, the transferor is liable for any obligations or liabilities imposed on a developer either by this chapter or by the time-share instrument relating to the retained special developer rights and arising after the transfer.

A transferor has no liability for any act or omission or any breach of a contractual or warranty obligation arising from the exercise of a special developer right by a successor developer who is not an affiliate of the transferor.

Unless otherwise provided in a mortgage instrument or deed of trust, in case of foreclosure of a mortgage, tax sale, judicial sale, sale by a trustee under a deed of trust, or sale under Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. § 101 et seq., or receivership proceedings, of any time shares owned by a developer in the time-share property, a person acquiring title to all the time shares being foreclosed or sold, but only upon his or her request, succeeds to all special developer rights, or only to any rights reserved in the time-share instrument to §

34-41-2.06

and held by that developer to maintain sales offices, management offices, models, and signs. The judgment or instrument conveying title must provide for transfer of only the special developer rights requested.

Upon foreclosure, tax sale, judicial sale, sale by a trustee under a deed of trust, or sale under Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. § 101 et seq., or receivership proceedings, of all time shares in a property owned by a developer:

The right to appoint, control, or serve as the managing entity terminates unless the judgment or instrument conveying title provides for transfer of all special developer rights to a successor developer; and

The developer ceases to have any other special developer rights.

The liabilities and obligations of a person who succeeds to a special developer right are as follows:

A successor to any special developer right who is an affiliate of a developer is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed on the transferor by this chapter or by the time-share instrument.

A successor to any special developer right, other than a successor described in subdivisions (3) or (4) of this subsection, who is not an affiliate of a developer, is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed by this chapter or the time-share instrument:

On a developer, which relate to his or her exercise or non-exercise of special developer rights; or

On his or her transferor, other than:

Misrepresentations by any previous developer;

Warranty obligations on improvements made by any previous developer or made before the property became a time-share property;

Breach of any fiduciary obligation by any previous developer of his or her appointees; or

Any liability or obligation imposed on the transferor as a result of the transferor’s acts or omissions after the transfer.

A successor to only a right to maintain sales offices, management offices, models, and signs (§

34-41-2.06

), if he or she is not an affiliate of a developer, may not exercise any other special developer right and is not subject to any liability or obligation as a developer, except the obligation to provide a public offering statement, and any liability arising as a result thereof, and obligations under Article V of this chapter.

A successor to all special developer rights held by his or her transferor who is not an affiliate of that developer and who has succeeded to those rights pursuant to a deed in lieu of foreclosure or a judgment or instrument conveying title to the time shares under subsection (c) may declare his or her intention in a recorded instrument to hold those rights solely for transfer to another person. Thereafter, until transferring all special developer rights to any person acquiring title to any time share owned by the successor, or until recording an instrument permitting exercise of all those rights, that successor may not exercise any of those rights other than any right held by his or her transferor to appoint, control, or serve as the managing entity, and any attempted exercise of those rights is void. So long as a successor may not exercise special developer rights under this subsection, he or she is not subject to any liability or obligation as a developer other than liability for his or her acts and omissions in appointing, controlling, or serving as the managing entity.

Nothing in this section subjects any successor to a special developer right to any claims against or other obligations of a transferor developer, other than claims and obligations arising under this chapter or the time-share instrument.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-3.05.
Termination of contracts and leases of developer.

If, before the developer ceases to appoint, control, or serve as the managing entity, there is entered into (i) any management contract, employment contract, or lease of recreational or parking areas or facilities, (ii) any other contract or lease between the managing entity and a developer or an affiliate of a developer, or (iii) any contract or lease that is not bona fide or was unconscionable to the time-share owners at the time entered into under the circumstances then prevailing, the contract may be terminated without penalty by the association or the time-share owners at any time after the developer ceases to appoint, control, or serve as the managing entity, upon not less than ninety (90) days’ notice to the other party. This subsection does not apply to any lease the termination of which would terminate the time-share property or reduce its size, unless the real estate subject to that lease was included in the property for the purpose of avoiding the right to terminate a lease under this section.

If there is no association, any time-share owner individually or on behalf of the class of time-share owners may maintain an action for appropriate relief.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-3.06.
Upkeep of units.

Except to the extent otherwise provided by the time-share instrument, the managing entity is responsible for maintenance, repair, and replacement of the time-share units and any personal property available for use by time-share owners in conjunction therewith, other than personal property separately owned by a time-share owner. Each time-share owner shall afford access through his or her time-share unit reasonably necessary for those purposes, but if damage is inflicted on a time-share unit through which access is taken, the managing entity is responsible for its prompt repair. Subject to the provisions of law, a time-share instrument and other provisions of the time-share owner may not alter or change the appearance of a time-share unit without the consent of the managing entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-3.07.
Tort and contract liability.

A time-share owner is personally liable for his or her own acts and omissions and those of his or her employees and agents other than the managing entity.

An action may not be maintained against a time-share owner, nor is a time-share owner precluded from maintaining an action, merely because he or she owns a time share or is an officer, director, or member of the association.

An action in tort alleging a wrong done by a developer, a managing entity selected by the developer or his or her appointees, or an agent or employee of either, in connection with any portion of the property which the developer or the managing entity has the responsibility to maintain, may not be maintained against the association or any time-share owner other than a developer. Other actions in tort alleging a wrong done by an association or by an agent or employee of the association or an action arising from a contract made by or on behalf of the association may be maintained only against the association. If the tort or breach of contract occurred during any period of developer control, the developer is subject to liability for all unreimbursed losses suffered by the association or time-share owners as a result, including costs and reasonable attorney’s fees. The operation of any statute of limitations affecting the right of action of the association or time-share owners under this section is tolled until the period of developer control terminates. A time-share owner is not precluded from maintaining an action contemplated by this subsection because he or she is a time-share owner or a member or officer of the association.

A judgment for money against an association if recorded in the office of land evidence records in the municipality where the land is located, is a lien against all of the time shares, but no other property of a time-share owner is subject to the claims of creditors of the association.

A judgment against the association must be indexed in the name of the association.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-3.08.
Insurance.

Commencing not later than the time a developer offers a time share for sale in a time-share property in which the number of time shares is more than twelve (12), the managing entity shall maintain, to the extent reasonably available and applicable and not otherwise unanimously agreed by the time-share owners or provided by the developer or by a person managing a project of which the time-share property is a part:

Property insurance on the time-share property and any personal property available for use by time-share owners in conjunction therewith, other than personal property separately owned by a time-share owner, insuring against all risks of direct physical loss commonly insured against, in a total amount, after application of any deductibles, of not less than eighty percent (80%) of the actual cash value of the insured property, exclusive of land excavations, foundations, and other items normally excluded from property policies; and provided, however

Prospective purchasers shall also be notified of the option of purchasing insurance for the replacement value of the time share property and its cost; and

Prospective purchasers shall also be notified of the option of purchasing insurance for the loss of use of the time-share property and its cost; and

Liability insurance, including medical payments insurance, in an amount determined by the managing entity but not less than any amount specified in the time-share instrument, covering all occurrences commonly insured against for death, bodily injury, and property damage arising out of or in connection with the use, ownership, or maintenance of the time-share property and time-share units.

If the insurance described in subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2) is not reasonably available, the managing entity promptly shall cause notice of that fact to be hand-delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to all time-share owners. The managing entity shall make copies of all insurance policies available for inspection by the time-share owners during normal business hours. The time-share instrument may require the managing entity to carry any other insurance, and the managing entity in any event may carry any other insurance deemed appropriate.

Each insurance policy carried pursuant to subsection (a) must provide that:

Each time-share owner is an insured person under the policy whether designated as an insured by name individually or as part of a named group or otherwise, as his or her interest may appear;

The insurer waives its right to subrogation under the policy against any time-share owner or members of his or her household;

No act or omission by any time-share owner, unless acting within the scope of his or her authority on behalf of an association, will void the policy or be a condition to recovery by any other person under the policy; and

If, at the time of a loss under the policy, there is other insurance in the name of a time-share owner covering the same risk covered by the policy, the policy maintained pursuant to subsection (a) is primary insurance not contributing with the other insurance, and other insurance in the name of a time-share owner applies only to loss in excess of the primary coverage.

Unless the insurance required by subdivision (a)(1) is provided by a person managing a project of which the time-share property is a part, any loss covered by that insurance must be adjusted with, and the insurance proceeds from that loss are payable to, the insurance trustee (who may be a party in interest) designated in accordance with the time-share instrument. If none has been designated or if the designated trustee fails to serve, the managing entity is the insurance trustee. The insurance trustee shall hold any insurance proceeds in trust for time-share owners and lien holders as their interests may appear and be determined in accordance with §

34-41-2.05

. Subject to the provisions of subsection (g), the proceeds must be disbursed for the repair or restoration of the property, and time-share owners and lien holders are not entitled to receive payment of any portion of the proceeds unless there is (1) a surplus of proceeds after the property has been completely repaired or restored, or (2) a termination pursuant to §

34-41-2.05

.

An insurance policy issued pursuant to subsection (a) does not prevent a time-share owner from obtaining insurance for his or her own benefit.

An insurer that has issued an insurance policy under this section shall issue certificates or memoranda of insurance to any association and, upon written request, to any time-share owner, mortgagee, or beneficiary under a deed of trust. The insurance may not be cancelled until thirty (30) days after notice of the proposed cancellation has been mailed to any managing entity and each person to whom a certificate or memorandum of insurance has been issued, at their respective last known addresses.

Any portion of the time share property damaged or destroyed must be repaired or replaced promptly by the managing entity unless (i) another person repairs or replaces it, (ii) there is a termination (§

34-41-2.05

), (iii) repair or replacement would be illegal under any state or local health or safety statute or ordinance, (iv) eighty percent (80%) of the time-share owners, including every owner of a time share in a time-share unit that will not be rebuilt, vote not to rebuild, or (v) a decision not to rebuild the damaged property is made by another person empowered to make that decision. The cost of repair or replacement in excess of insurance proceeds and reserves is a time-share expense.

If the entire property need not be repaired or replaced, unless the time-share instrument provides otherwise, (i) the insurance proceeds attributable to the damaged area must be used to restore the damaged area to a condition compatible with the remainder of the property, and (ii) the insurance proceeds attributable to time-share units that are not rebuilt must be distributed as if those units constituted a time-share property in which all time shares had been terminated under §

34-41-2.05

.

The provisions of this section may be varied or waived in the case of a time-share property in which none of the time-share units may be used as dwellings or for recreational purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-3.09.
Surplus funds.

Unless otherwise provided in the time-share instrument, any surplus funds derived from the time-share owners or from property belonging to them or their association and held by a managing entity remaining after payment of or provision for time-share expenses and any pre-payment of reserves must be paid to the time-share owners in proportion to their time-share expense liabilities or credited to them to reduce their future time-share expense assessments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-3.10.
Assessments for time-share expenses.

Until time-share expense assessments are made against the time-share owners, the developer shall pay all time-share expenses. After any time-share expense assessment has been made against the time-share owners, time-share expense assessments must be made at least annually, based on a budget adopted at least annually by the managing entity.

Except for assessments under subsections (c), (d) and (e), all time-share expenses must be assessed against all the time shares in accordance with the allocations set forth in the time-share instrument pursuant to §

34-41-2.03(a)

. Any past due assessment or installment thereof bears interest at the rate established by the managing entity or time-share instrument not exceeding the highest legal percent per year.

To the extent required by the time-share instrument any time-share expense benefiting fewer than all of the time-share owners must be assessed exclusively against the time-share owners benefited.

Assessments to pay a judgment against the association (§

34-41-3.07

) may be made only against the time shares in the time-share property at the time the judgment was entered, in proportion to their time-share expense liabilities.

If any time-share expense is caused by the misconduct of any time-share owner, the association may assess that expense exclusively against his or her time share.

If time-share expense liabilities are reallocated, time-share expense assessments and any installment thereof not yet due must be recalculated in accordance with the reallocated time-share expense liabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-3.11.
Lien for assessments.

A person who has a duty to make assessments for time-share expenses has a lien on a time share for any assessment levied against that time share or fines imposed against its owner from the time the assessment or fine becomes due. The lien may be foreclosed in like manner as a mortgage on real estate (or a power of sale under chapter 27 of this title), or, in the case of a time-share license, under the Uniform Commercial Code, title 6A. Unless the time-share instrument otherwise provides, fees, charges, late charges, fines, and interest charged pursuant to § 34-41-3.02(8) and (9) are enforceable as assessments under this section. If an assessment is payable in installments the full amount of the assessment is a lien from the time the first installment thereof becomes due.

A lien under this section is prior to all other liens and encumbrances on a time share except:

Liens and encumbrances recorded before the recordation of the time-share instrument;

Mortgages and deeds of trust on the time share securing first mortgage holders and recorded before the due date of the assessment or the due date of the first installment payable on the assessment;

Liens for real estate taxes and other governmental assessments or charges against the time share; and

Liens securing assessments or charges made by a person managing a project of which the time-share property is a part.

To the extent of the time-share expense assessments made under §

34-41-3.10(b)

become due during the six (6) months immediately preceding institution of an action to enforce the lien, the lien is also prior to the mortgages and deeds of trust described in subdivision (1)(ii) of this subsection. This subsection does not affect the priority of mechanics’ or materialmen’s liens.

The lien is perfected upon recordation of a claim of lien in the municipality in which the time-share unit is situated.

A lien for unpaid assessments is extinguished unless proceedings to enforce the lien are instituted within three (3) years after the assessments become payable.

This section does not prohibit actions or suits to recover sums for which subsection (a) creates a lien or preclude resort to any contractual or other remedy permitted by law.

A judgment or decree in any action or suit brought under this section must include costs and reasonable attorney’s fees for the prevailing party.

A person who has a duty to make assessments for time-share expenses shall furnish to a time-share owner upon written request a recordable statement setting forth the amount of unpaid assessments currently levied against his or her time share. The statement must be furnished within ten (10) business days after receipt of the request and is binding in favor of persons reasonably relying thereon.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-3.12.
Financial records.

A person who has a duty to make time-share expense assessments shall keep financial records sufficiently detailed to enable him or her to comply with §

34-41-4.07

. All financial and other records must be made reasonably available for examination by any time-share owner or his or her authorized agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-3.13.
Authority of trustee.

With respect to a third person dealing with a trustee, under §

34-41-2.05

or §

34-41-3.08

, the existence of trust powers and their proper exercise by the trustee may be assumed without inquiry. A third person is not bound to inquire whether the trustee has power to act as trustee or is properly exercising trust powers, and a third person without actual knowledge that the trustee is exceeding or improperly exercising his or her powers is fully protected in dealing with the trustee as if he or she possessed and were properly exercising the power he or she purports to exercise. A third person is not bound to assure the proper application of trust assets paid or delivered to the trustee in his or her capacity as trustee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-3.14.
Initiative, referendum, and recall — General provisions.

For the purpose of this section and §§

34-41-3.15

,

34-41-3.16

, and

34-41-3.17

:

“Owner” means a person who is an owner or co-owner of a time-share estate or, in the case of a unit that is not a time-share unit, a person who is an owner or co-owner of the unit, other than as security for an obligation.

A project is limited to one in which at least fifty percent (50%) of the votes are allocated to time shares other than time-share licenses.

The managing entity shall keep reasonably available for inspection and copying by any owner all addresses, known to it or to the developer, of all the owners, with the principal permanent residence address of each indicated if known. The managing entity shall revise continually the list of addresses in the light of any information it obtains, and the developer shall keep the managing entity advised of any information he or she has or obtains.

Each ballot prepared pursuant to §§

34-41-3.15

,

34-41-3.16

, and

34-41-3.17

must contain:

A statement that the ballot will not be counted unless signed by an owner;

The specification of a date, not less than thirty (30) or more than one hundred eighty (180) days after the date the ballot is mailed, by which the ballot must be received by the person to whom it is to be returned, and a statement that the ballot will not be counted unless received by that date;

The name and address of the person to whom the ballot is to be returned; and

No material other than what is required by this Article.

Each ballot mailed pursuant to §§

34-41-3.15

,

34-41-3.16

, and

34-41-3.17

must be mailed to the principal permanent residence of the owner to whom it is addressed, if known to the person responsible for mailing it, and that person shall procure and keep reasonably available for inspection for at least one year after the vote is calculated a certificate of mailing for each and the original or a photocopy of each ballot returned by the date specified pursuant to subsection (c)(2).

If the managing entity, the developer, or anyone on behalf of either of them communicates with any owner, other than as expressly authorized by §§

34-41-3.15

,

34-41-3.16

, and

34-41-3.17

on the subject matter of any petition or ballot prepared pursuant to any of those sections, the expense of that communication may not be assessed directly or indirectly in whole or in part to any owner other than developer.

The vote allocated to any time share and to any unit other than a time-share unit must be counted as having been cast in accordance with the ballot of any owner of that time share. If the ballots of different owners of the same time share, or of the same unit other than a time-share unit, are not in accord with one another, the vote allocated to that time share or unit must be divided in proportion to the number of owners thereof voting each way and must be counted accordingly. Any ballot that is not signed by an owner or is not received by the date specified pursuant to subsection (c)(2) is void.

The managing entity shall take action reasonably calculated to notify all owners of the resolution of any matters resolved by methods authorized by §§

34-41-3.15

,

34-41-3.16

and

34-41-3.17

.

An amendment to a project instrument adopted pursuant to §§

34-41-3.15

and

34-41-3.16

must be recorded by the managing entity with a statement of the vote and becomes effective upon recordation.

No right or power of an owner under this section or §§

34-41-3.15

,

34-41-3.16

, or

34-41-3.17

may be waived, limited, or delegated by contract, power of attorney, proxy, or otherwise, in favor of the developer, an affiliate of a developer, a managing entity, or any person designated by any of them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-3.15.
Direct initiative by owners.

The owners may amend the project instrument or any unrecorded document governing the project, or approve or disapprove any proposed expenditure, in the manner provided by this section in addition to any manner permitted by other law or by the instrument or document.

Any owner may deliver to the managing entity a petition containing the language of any proposed amendment and signed by owners of at least one time share or other state or interest in each of a number of units to which at least thirty-three and one-third percent (331/3%) of the votes are allocated, or any smaller percentage specified by the document to be amended. The owner delivering the petition may attach to it a letter of not more than two (2) pages to be mailed with the ballots. Within ten (10) days after receiving the petition, the managing entity shall mail to each owner a ballot setting forth the language of the petition and affording an opportunity to indicate a preference between approval and disapproval of the proposal, together with a copy of any letter of not more than two (2) pages attached by the owner who delivered the petition. The ballot may also be accompanied by a letter of not more than two (2) pages from the managing entity recommending approval or disapproval of the proposal.

On the date specified pursuant to §

34-41-3.14(c)(2)

, the managing entity shall examine the ballots that have been returned and calculate the vote accordingly. A signature on the petition must be treated for the purpose of §

34-41-3.14(f)

as a ballot from the signer indicating approval of the proposed amendment. A simple majority of the votes counted suffices for the adoption of the proposal unless other law or the document to be amended specifies a larger majority or, in the case of a proposed expenditure, the project instruments specify a larger majority not exceeding sixty-six and two-thirds percent (662/3%). No document may specify more than a simple majority for any proposal the managing entity could have effected unilaterally. No proposal may be adopted by an initiative in which the ballots favoring the proposal represent less than ten percent (10%) of the votes allocated to all owners.

A proposal adopted pursuant to this section may not be repealed or modified within three (3) years except by another initiative pursuant to this section. Thereafter, the managing entity may not repeal or modify the result without the approval of the owners in a referendum. If the project instrument permits the managing entity to initiate a referendum for that purpose, no referendum may be initiated for that purpose more often than once every three (3) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.

34-41-3.16.
Referendum of owners.

No amendment to the project instrument may be adopted except pursuant to this section or §

34-41-3.15

. The project instrument may specify other matters to be determined by referendum of the owners and may permit the managing entity to select matters to be determined in that manner.

Whenever an amendment to a project instrument proposed by the managing entity, or other matter, is to be determined by referendum, the managing entity shall prepare and, not less than thirty (30) days or more than one hundred eighty (180) days before the votes are to be counted, shall mail to each owner a ballot stating each matter to be determined and affording the opportunity to vote “yes” or “no” on each matter. The ballot may be accompanied by a letter from the managing entity recommending a particular decision.

On the date specified pursuant to §

34-41-3.14(c)(2)

, the managing entity shall examine the ballots and calculate the vote accordingly. A simple majority of the votes counted determines each matter in question unless the project instrument specifies a larger majority, but no matter may be determined by referendum unless the ballots favoring the majority decision represent at least ten percent (10%) of the votes allocated to all owners.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 141, § 2.